Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.080

Application and construction of act as to wills, proceedings, guardians, accrued rights, and pre-executed instruments—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117.

On and after October 1, 1974:

(1) The provisions of chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. shall apply to any wills of decedents dying thereafter;

(2) The provisions of chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. shall apply to any proceedings in court then pending or thereafter commenced regardless of the time of the death of decedent except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of infeasibility of application of the procedure of chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess.;

(3) Every personal representative including a person administering an estate of a minor or incompetent holding an appointment on October 1, 1974, continues to hold the appointment, has the powers conferred by chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. and is subject to the duties imposed with respect to any act occurring or done thereafter;

(4) An act done before October 1, 1974 in any proceeding and any accrued right is not impaired by chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute before October 1, 1974, the provisions shall remain in force with respect to that right;

(5) Any rule of construction or presumption provided in chapter 117, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. applies to instruments executed before October 1, 1974 unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 1.]

NOTES:

Legislative directive—Part headings not part of law: "(1) Sections 4 and 5 of this 1974 amendatory act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

(2) Sections 52 and 53 of this 1974 amendatory act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

(3) Part headings employed in this 1974 amendatory act do not constitute any part of the law and shall not be codified by the code reviser and shall not become a part of the Revised Code of Washington." [ 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 2.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 117: "If any provision of this 1974 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 3.]

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: "This 1974 amendatory act shall take effect October 1, 1974." [ 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 56.]